trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="/god__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedre</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>godt</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>god</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gode</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedste</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedst</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alm/indelig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indeligt</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indelig</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indelige</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indeligste</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sik/ker__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kert</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/lille__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mindre</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>småt</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lille</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>små</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mindst</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mindste</l>
          <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/mange__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>flere</l>
          <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manges</l>
          <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mange</l>
          <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fleste</l>
          <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>flest</l>
          <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/stor__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>større</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stort</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stor</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>store<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></l>
          <r>stor</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>store</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allerstørste</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="ssup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>største</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>størst</l>
          <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="snavse/t__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bit/ter__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tert</l>
          <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reste</l>
          <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ung__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yngre</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unges</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ungt</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unge</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yngste</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sti/v__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>veste</l>
          <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="ikke__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="på__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alt_imens__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

    <e lm="af"><i>af</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bag"><i>bag</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="efter"><i>efter</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="forbi"><i>forbi</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="før"><i>før</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gennem"><i>gennem</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="til"><i>til</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="på"><i>på</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fra"><i>fra</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mellem"><i>mellem</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="uden"><i>uden</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mod"><i>mod</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ovenover"><i>ovenover</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ovenpå"><i>ovenpå</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="og"><i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="samt"><i>samt</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="men"><i>men</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="eller"><i>eller</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="fordi"><i>fordi</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hvis"><i>hvis</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="når"><i>når</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="som"><i>som</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="selv om"><i>selv<b/>om</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="dengang"><i>dengang</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="end"><i>end</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="fordi"><i>fordi</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="før"><i>før</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvorvidt"><i>hvorvidt</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="imens"><i>imens</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="indtil"><i>indtil</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ligesom"><i>ligesom</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="medmindre"><i>medmindre</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="når"><i>når</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="selvom"><i>selvom</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="skønt"><i>skønt</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="såfremt"><i>såfremt</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="almindelig"><i>alm</i><par n="alm/indelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bitter"><i>bit</i><par n="bit/ter__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="god"><i></i><par n="/god__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lille"><i></i><par n="/lille__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mange"><i></i><par n="/mange__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sikker"><i>sik</i><par n="sik/ker__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="snavset"><i>snavse</i><par n="snavse/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stiv"><i>sti</i><par n="sti/v__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stor"><i></i><par n="/stor__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ung"><i></i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="altid"><i>altid</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bort"><i>bort</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="deraf"><i>deraf</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="før"><i>før</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hen"><i>hen</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvordan"><i>hvordan</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvorefter"><i>hvorefter</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvorhenne"><i>hvorhenne</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ikke"><i>ikke</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kort"><i>kort</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nonchalant"><i>nonchalant</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pludseligt"><i>pludseligt</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="så"><i>så</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meget"><i>meget</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="senere"><i>senere</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hjemme"><i>hjemme</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tilsammen"><i>tilsammen</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="først"><i>først</i><par n="ikke__adv"/></e>
